New Jersey, session 222, A3607.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this section: Board means the New Jersey Board of Public Utilities or a successor agency. Covered facility means an electric generation facility in the State that is connected to the electric grid serving New Jersey. Replacement facility means an electric generation facility in the State that produces electricity solely through renewable energy sources, which shall include, but not be limited to, thermal, wind, hydropower, and nuclear, and that is connected to the electric grid serving New Jersey. b.    The board shall not retire, or otherwise recommend, incentivize, or authorize the retirement of, a covered facility unless the board has identified one or more replacement facilities that can: (1) produce enough electricity to meet the demand served by the covered facility; and (2) become operational in a timely manner so as to reduce any significant gap in generation service between the time when the covered facility retires and the replacement facility becomes operational. c.     Nothing in this act shall be construed to prevent the board from retiring, or otherwise recommending, incentivizing, or authorizing the retirement of, a covered facility that is no longer functional or that is operating in an unsafe or unlawful manner that threatens public health and safety. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.